sl-SI: Vrsta vrvi za poi: Kroglična verižica; Veriga; Vrvica; Elastična vrvica; Trak; Vrv; Trak/tkanina; Žični kabel; Drugo
ru: Тип стропа пои: Шариковая цепь; Цепь; Шнур; Эластичный шнур; Лента; Веревка; Ремешок/стропа; Трос; Другое
en: Poi tether type: Beaded chain; Chain; Cord; Elastic cord; Ribbon; Rope; Strap/webbing; Wire cable; Other
fr: Type de lien du poi: Chaîne à billes; Chaîne; Cordelette; Corde élastique; Ruban; Corde; Sangle; Câble métallique; Autre
hu: Poi rögzítőelem típusa: Bogyós lánc; Lánc; Zsinór; Gumizsinór; Szalag; Kötél; Pánt/heveder; Drótkötél; Egyéb
el: Τύπος πρόσδεσης poi: Αλυσίδα με χάντρες; Αλυσίδα; Κορδόνι; Ελαστικό κορδόνι; Κορδέλα; Σχοινί; Ιμάντας/πλέγμα; Συρματόσχοινο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip de legătură Poi: Lanț cu bile; Lanț; Șnur; Șnur elastic; Panglică; Frânghie; Curea/chingă; Cablu metalic; Altele
fi: Poin kiinnitystapa: Palloketju; Ketju; Naru; Joustava naru; Nauha; Köysi; Hihna/nauha; Vaijeri; Muu
pt-BR: Poi tipo de cordão: Corrente de contas; Corrente; Cordão; Cordão elástico; Fita; Corda; Correia/tecido; Cabo de aço; Outro
sv: Typ av koppling för poi: Kulkedja; Kedja; Snöre; Elastiskt snöre; Band; Rep; Rem/sadelgjord; Vajerkabel; Övrigt
zh-CN: 甩球连接绳类型: 珠链; 链条; 绳索; 弹力绳; 丝带; 绳子; 绑带/织带; 钢丝缆绳; 其他
vi: Loại dây buộc Poi: Dây chuyền hạt; Dây xích; Dây thừng nhỏ; Dây đàn hồi; Ruy băng; Dây thừng; Dây đeo/dây dệt; Dây cáp kẽm; Khác
cs: Typ úvazu Poi: Kuličkový řetízek; Řetěz; Šňůra; Elastická šňůra; Stuha; Provaz; Popruh/páska; Ocelové lanko; Jiné
nb: Tjoretype for poi: Kulekjede; Kjede; Snor; Elastisk snor; Bånd; Tau; Stropp/bånd; Stålkabel; Annet
lt-LT: Poi virvutės tipas: Karoliukų grandinėlė; Grandinė; Virvutė; Elastinė virvutė; Kaspinas; Virvė; Diržas / juosta; Vielinis trosas; Kita
it: Tipo di cordino del poi: Catenella a pallini; Catena; Cordino; Cordino elastico; Nastro; Corda; Cinghia/fettuccia; Cavo metallico; Altro
de: Art der Poi-Verbindung: Kugelkette; Kette; Kordel; Elastische Kordel; Band; Seil; Gurt/Gurtband; Drahtseil; Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ popruhu poi: Guľôčková retiazka; Retiazka; Šnúrka; Elastická šnúrka; Stuha; Lano; Popruh/tkanina; Drôtené lanko; Iné
nl: Poi tether type: Kralenketting; Ketting; Koord; Elastisch koord; Lint; Touw; Band/webbing; Staalkabel; Overig
bg-BG: Тип въже за пои: Верижка от топчета; Верига; Връв; Еластична връв; Лента; Въже; Каишка/ремък; Телен кабел; Други
es: Tipo de atadura del poi: Cadena de cuentas; Cadena; Cordón; Cordón elástico; Cinta; Cuerda; Correa/cinta; Cable de alambre; Otro
da: Poi-fastgørelsestype: Kuglekæde; Kæde; Snor; Elastiksnor; Bånd; Reb; Rem/gjordbånd; Wire-kabel; Andet
zh-TW: Poi 繫繩類型: 珠鍊; 鍊條; 繩索; 彈力繩; 絲帶; 粗繩; 綁帶/織帶; 鋼纜; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta vezice za Poi: Lanac s kuglicama; Lanac; Uzica; Elastična uzica; Vrpca; Uže; Remen / tkana traka; Žičani kabel; Ostalo
tr: Poi bağlantı tipi: Boncuklu zincir; Zincir; Kordon; Elastik kordon; Kurdele; İp; Kayış/dokuma; Tel kablo; Diğer
ja: ポイテザータイプ: ビーズチェーン; チェーン; コード; ゴムコード; リボン; ロープ; ストラップ/ウェビング; ワイヤーケーブル; その他
ko: 포이 테더 유형: 비즈 체인; 체인; 코드; 탄성 코드; 리본; 로프; 스트랩/웨빙; 와이어 케이블; 기타
th: ประเภทสายยึด Poi: โซ่ไข่ปลา; โซ่; เชือกเส้นเล็ก; สายยางยืด; ริบบิ้น; เชือก; สายรัด/สายถัก; สายเคเบิลลวด; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de tether Poi: Corrente de contas; Corrente; Cordão; Cordão elástico; Fita; Corda; Correia/cinta; Cabo de arame; Outro
pl: Typ uwięzi poi: Łańcuszek kuleczkowy; Łańcuch; Sznurek; Elastyczny sznurek; Wstążka; Lina; Pasek/taśma; Linka stalowa; Inne